Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2837
Practice of pharmacy, defined.

(1) Practice of pharmacy means (a) the interpretation, evaluation, and implementation of a medical order, (b) the dispensing of drugs and devices, (c) drug product selection, (d) the administration of drugs or devices, (e) drug utilization review, (f) patient counseling, (g) the provision of pharmaceutical care, (h) medication therapy management, and (i) the responsibility for compounding and labeling of dispensed or repackaged drugs and devices, proper and safe storage of drugs and devices, and maintenance of proper records.

(2) The active practice of pharmacy means the performance of the functions set out in this section by a pharmacist as his or her principal or ordinary occupation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 933;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 38.